Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 5. Dissolution.

Sec. 10.20.290.
Voluntary dissolution.

A corporation may dissolve and wind up its affairs in the manner set out in (b) and (c) of this section.

If there are members entitled to vote, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending that the corporation be dissolved, and directing that the question of the dissolution be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice stating that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the advisability of dissolving the corporation, shall be given to each member entitled to vote at the meeting, within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members. A resolution to dissolve the corporation shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds of the votes which members present at the meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote, the dissolution of the corporation shall be authorized at a meeting of the board of directors upon the adoption of a resolution to dissolve by the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

Upon the adoption of a resolution by the members, or by the board of directors if there are no members or no members entitled to vote, the corporation shall cease to conduct its affairs except as may be necessary to wind them up, shall immediately cause a notice of the proposed dissolution to be mailed to each known creditor of the corporation, and shall proceed to collect its assets and apply and distribute them as provided in this chapter.

Following the adoption of a resolution to dissolve, a copy of it executed by the corporation’s president or vice-president and a secretary or assistant secretary shall be immediately filed with the commissioner. The resolution must state the number of members and the number of directors voting for and against it.

A corporation, which has filed a resolution of voluntary dissolution, which has not concluded its affairs and received a certificate of dissolution, within two years after the date of filing the resolution, shall be involuntarily dissolved by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 31 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 33 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes. Minor word changes were made in the introductory material of former subsection (a) to reflect the reorganization and that material retained the designation of (a). Former paragraphs (a)(1) and (2) were redesignated as subsections (b) and (c) respectively, and former subsections (b) — (d) were redesignated as (d) — (f).

Sec. 10.20.295.
Distribution of assets.

The assets of a corporation in the process of dissolution shall be applied and distributed as follows:

all liabilities and obligations of the corporation shall be paid and discharged, or adequate provision shall be made therefor;

assets held by the corporation upon condition requiring return, transfer or conveyance, which condition occurs by reason of the dissolution, shall be returned, transferred or conveyed in accordance with the requirements;

assets received and held by the corporation subject to limitations permitting their use only for charitable, religious, eleemosynary, benevolent, educational or similar purposes, but not held upon a condition requiring return, transfer or conveyance by reason of the dissolution, shall be transferred or conveyed to one or more domestic or foreign corporations, societies or organizations engaged in activities substantially similar to those of the dissolving corporation, under a plan of distribution adopted as provided in this chapter;

other assets, if any, shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of the articles of incorporation or bylaws to the extent that the articles of incorporation or bylaws determine the distributive rights of members, or any class or classes of members, or provide for distribution to others;

any remaining assets may be distributed to persons, societies, organizations or domestic or foreign corporations, whether for profit or nonprofit, as may be specified in a plan of distribution adopted as provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Opinions of attorney general. —

A nonprofit corporation formed to receive and spend aid to unincorporated communities under ch. 60, SLA 1981 may, upon dissolution, convey its assets to a Native council.
Once aid money has been distributed to and spent properly by a qualified corporate entity, neither the community aid legislation nor the department’s regulations prohibit a conveyance of the corporation’s assets. July 15, 1986, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 10.20.300.
Plan of distribution.

A plan providing for the distribution of assets, not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, may be adopted by a corporation in the process of dissolution and shall be adopted by a corporation for the purpose of authorizing a transfer or conveyance of assets for which this chapter requires a plan of distribution, in the manner set out in this section.

If there are members entitled to vote, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending a plan of distribution and directing the submission to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice setting out the proposed plan of distribution or a summary shall be given to each member entitled to vote at the meeting, within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for giving notice of meetings of members. The plan of distribution shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds of the votes which members present at the meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote, a plan of distribution shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors upon receiving a vote of a majority of the directors in office.

A plan of distribution shall be immediately filed with the commissioner. The plan of distribution must state the number of members and the number of directors voting for and against it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 32 ch 170 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes. The former introductory material was designated as subsection (a) and minor word changes were made to reflect the reorganization. Former paragraphs (1) — (3) were redesignated as subsections (b) — (d) respectively.

Sec. 10.20.305.
Revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings.

A corporation may, at any time before the issuance of a certificate of dissolution by the commissioner, revoke the action taken to dissolve the corporation, in the manner set out in this section.

If there are members entitled to vote, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending that the voluntary dissolution proceedings be revoked, and directing that the question of revocation be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice stating that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the advisability of revoking the voluntary dissolution proceedings, shall be given to each member entitled to vote at the meeting, within the time and in the manner provided in this chapter for the giving of notice of meetings of members. A resolution to revoke the voluntary dissolution proceedings shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds of the votes which members present at the meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote, a resolution to revoke the voluntary dissolution proceedings shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors upon receiving the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

Upon the adoption of the resolution by the members, or by the board of directors where there are no members or no members entitled to vote on it, the corporation may again conduct its affairs.

Upon the adoption of the resolution, a copy shall immediately be filed with the commissioner. The resolution must state the number of members and the number of directors voting for and against it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 33 ch 170 SLA 1976)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, this section was reorganized to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes. The former introductory material was designated as subsection (a) and minor word changes were made to reflect the reorganization. Former paragraphs (1) — (4) were redesignated as subsections (b) — (e) respectively.

Sec. 10.20.310.
Articles of dissolution.

If voluntary dissolution proceedings have not been revoked, then, after all debts, liabilities, and obligations of the corporation have been paid and discharged, or adequate provision made for payment, and all of the remaining property and assets of the corporation transferred, conveyed, or distributed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, articles of dissolution shall be executed in duplicate by the corporation by its president or a vice-president and its secretary or an assistant secretary. The articles of dissolution must set out

the name of the corporation;

if there are members entitled to vote,

a statement setting out the date of the meeting of members at which the resolution to dissolve was adopted, that a quorum was present at the meeting, and that the resolution received at least two-thirds of the votes that members present at the meeting or represented by proxy were entitled to cast; or

a statement that the resolution was adopted by a consent in writing signed by all members entitled to vote;

if there are no members, or no members entitled to vote, a statement of the fact, the date of the meeting of the board of directors at which the resolution to dissolve was adopted, and a statement of the fact that the resolution received the vote of a majority of the directors in office;

that all debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation have been paid and discharged or that adequate provision has been made for the payment;

a copy of the plan of distribution, if any, as adopted by the corporation, or a statement that no plan was adopted;

that all the remaining property and assets of the corporation have been transferred, conveyed, or distributed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter;

that there are no suits pending against the corporation in any court, or that adequate provision has been made for the satisfaction of a judgment, order, or decree that may be entered against it in a pending suit.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 34 ch 65 SLA 1998)

Sec. 10.20.315.
Filing of articles of dissolution.

Duplicate originals of the articles of dissolution shall be delivered to the commissioner. Upon finding that the articles of dissolution conform to law, the commissioner shall, when all fees prescribed by this chapter have been paid:

endorse on each of the duplicate originals the word “filed,” and the date of the filing;

file one of the duplicate originals in the commissioner’s office;

issue a certificate of dissolution and affix the other duplicate original to it.

The certificate of dissolution, together with the duplicate original of the articles of dissolution affixed shall be returned to the representative of the dissolved corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.320.
Effect of certificate of dissolution.

Upon the issuance of the certificate of dissolution the existence of the corporation ceases, except for the purpose of suits, other proceedings and appropriate corporate action by members, directors, and officers as provided in this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.325.
Grounds for involuntary dissolution.

A corporation may be dissolved involuntarily by the commissioner when it is established that

the corporation has failed to file its biennial report within the time required by this chapter;

the corporation procured its articles of incorporation through fraud;

the corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law;

the corporation has failed for 30 days to appoint and maintain a registered agent in the state;

the corporation has failed for 30 days after change of its registered office or registered agent to file in the office of the commissioner a statement of the change;

the corporation has failed, within the time required by this chapter, to revoke or complete a plan of voluntary dissolution; or

the corporation is 90 days delinquent in filing a notice of change of an officer or director as required by this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 34 ch 170 SLA 1976; am §§ 53, 54 ch 123 SLA 1980)

Sec. 10.20.330.
Notification to attorney general. [Repealed, § 35 ch 170 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 10.20.335.
Notice to corporation.

When the commissioner determines that a corporation has given any cause for involuntary dissolution, the commissioner shall mail to the corporation a notice, setting out the grounds for involuntary dissolution, 60 days before a certificate of dissolution is issued. The commissioner shall mail the notice and any subsequent certificate of dissolution in the same manner as required for notices and certificates of involuntary dissolution under AS

10.06.633(i)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 36 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 4 ch 45 SLA 1999)

Sec. 10.20.340.
Action for involuntary dissolution. [Repealed, § 37 ch 170 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 10.20.345.
Removal of ground for dissolution.

If the corporation, within the time required by this chapter, files its biennial report or appoints or maintains a registered agent as provided in this chapter, or files with the commissioner the required statement of change of registered office or registered agent, or revokes or concludes a plan of voluntary dissolution, the commissioner’s authority to involuntarily dissolve the corporation ceases.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 38 ch 170 SLA 1976; am § 55 ch 123 SLA 1980)

Sec. 10.20.350.
Jurisdiction and process. [Repealed, § 39 ch 170 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 10.20.355.
Jurisdiction of court to liquidate assets and business of corporation.

The superior court may liquidate the assets and business of a corporation in the cases provided in AS

10.20.360

—

10.20.370

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968; am § 40 ch 170 SLA 1976)

Sec. 10.20.360.
Action by members for liquidation.

In an action by a member, the superior court may liquidate the assets and business of a corporation when it is established that

the directors are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs, the members are unable to break the deadlock, and irreparable injury to the corporation is being suffered or is threatened by reason of the deadlock;

the acts of the directors or those in control of the corporation are illegal, oppressive, or fraudulent;

the members are deadlocked in voting power, and have failed, for a period which includes at least two consecutive annual meeting dates, to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired or would have expired upon the election of their successors; or

the corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.365.
Action by creditor for liquidation.

In an action by a creditor, the superior court may liquidate the assets and business of a corporation when

the claim of the creditor has been reduced to judgment and an execution on the judgment has been returned unsatisfied and it is established that the corporation is insolvent; or

the corporation has admitted in writing that the claim of the creditor is due and owing and it is established that the corporation is insolvent.

In this section “insolvent” means inability of a corporation to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of its business.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was formerly AS

10.20.720

(8).
Renumbered in 2012.

Sec. 10.20.370.
Liquidation on application by corporation.

Upon application by a corporation that has filed a statement of intent to dissolve, as provided in this chapter, to have its liquidation continued under the supervision of the court, the superior court may liquidate the assets and affairs of the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.375.
Liquidation in action by attorney general for dissolution. [Repealed, § 41 ch 170 SLA 1976.]

Sec. 10.20.380.
Joinder of members.

It is not necessary to make members parties to an action or proceeding for liquidation of the assets of a corporation unless relief is sought against them personally.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.385.
Procedure in liquidation of corporation by court.

In a proceeding to liquidate the assets and business of a corporation the superior court may issue injunctions, appoint a receiver pendente lite with powers and duties as the court may direct, and take other proceedings necessary to preserve the corporate assets wherever situated and carry on the business of the corporation until a full hearing is had.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.390.
Appointment of receiver; powers.

After a hearing held upon such notice as the court may direct to be given to all parties to the proceedings and to any other parties in interest designated by the court, the court may appoint a liquidating receiver with authority to collect the assets of the corporation, including amounts owing to the corporation by members.
The liquidating receiver may, subject to the order of the court, sell, convey, and dispose of all or a part of the assets of the corporation wherever situated, either at public or private sale.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.395.
Disposition of assets or proceeds.

The assets of the corporation or the proceeds resulting from a sale, conveyance, or other disposition of the assets shall be applied and distributed as follows:

all costs and expenses of the court proceedings and all liabilities and obligations of the corporation shall be paid, satisfied, and discharged, or adequate provision shall be made for payment;

assets held by the corporation upon condition requiring return, transfer, or conveyance, which condition occurs by reason of the dissolution or liquidation, shall be returned, transferred, or conveyed in accordance with these requirements;

assets received and held by the corporation subject to limitations permitting their use only for charitable, religious, eleemosynary, benevolent, educational or similar purposes, but not held upon a condition requiring return, transfer or conveyance by reason of the dissolution or liquidation, shall be transferred or conveyed to one or more domestic or foreign corporations, societies or organizations engaged in activities substantially similar to those of the dissolving or liquidating corporation as the court may direct;

other assets, if any, shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of the articles of incorporation or the bylaws to the extent that the articles of incorporation or bylaws determine the distributive right of members, or any class or classes of members, or provide for distribution to others;

any remaining assets may be distributed to persons, societies, organizations, or domestic or foreign corporations, whether for profit or not for profit, specified in the plan of distribution adopted as provided in this chapter, or where no plan of distribution has been adopted, as the court may direct.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.400.
Powers and duties of receiver.

The order appointing the liquidating receiver shall state the receiver’s powers and duties.
The powers and duties may be increased or diminished at any time during the liquidation proceedings.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.405.
Compensation of receiver and attorneys.

The court may allow from time to time, as expenses of the liquidation, compensation to the receiver and to attorneys in the proceeding, and direct the payment of compensation out of the assets of the corporation or the proceeds of a sale or disposition of assets.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.410.
Power of receiver to sue and defend.

A receiver of a corporation appointed under this chapter may sue and defend in all courts in the receiver’s own name as receiver of the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.415.
Exclusive jurisdiction of appointing court.

The court appointing the receiver has exclusive jurisdiction of the corporation and its property, wherever situated.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.420.
Qualifications of receivers.

A receiver shall be a citizen of the United States or a corporation authorized to act as receiver, which corporation may be a domestic corporation or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in the state.
A receiver shall give the bond the court directs with sureties the court requires.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.425.
Filing of claims in liquidation proceedings.

In a proceeding to liquidate the assets and business of a corporation the court may require creditors of the corporation to file with the clerk of the court or with the receiver, in the form the court prescribes, proof under oath of their respective claims.

If the court requires the filing of claims it shall fix a date, not less than four months from the date of the order, as the last day for the filing of claims, and shall prescribe the notice to be given to creditors and claimants of the date fixed. Before the date fixed, the court may extend the time of the filing of claims.

A creditor who fails to file proof of a claim on or before the date fixed may be barred by order of the court from participating in the distribution of the assets of the corporation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.430.
Discontinuance of liquidation proceedings.

The liquidation of the assets and business of a corporation may be discontinued at any time during the liquidation proceeding when it is established that cause for liquidation no longer exists.
In this event, the court shall dismiss the proceeding and direct the receiver to redeliver to the corporation its remaining property and assets.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.435.
Decree of involuntary dissolution.

In proceedings to liquidate the assets and business of a corporation, when the costs and expenses of the proceeding and the debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation have been paid and discharged or when the remaining property and assets are not sufficient to satisfy and discharge the costs, expenses, debts, and obligations, and all the property and assets have been applied to their payment, the court shall enter a decree dissolving the corporation.
Upon entry of the decree, the existence of the corporation ceases.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.440.
Filing of decree of dissolution.

If the court enters a decree dissolving a corporation, the clerk of the court shall file a certified copy of the decree with the commissioner.
A fee may not be charged for this filing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.445.
Deposit with commissioner of amount due creditors or members.

Upon the voluntary or involuntary dissolution of a corporation, the portion of the assets distributable to a creditor or member who is unknown or cannot be found, or who is under disability and there is no legally competent person to receive the distributive portion, shall be reduced to cash and deposited with the commissioner and shall be paid over to the creditor or member or the legal representative of the creditor or member upon proof satisfactory to the commissioner of a right to it.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Sec. 10.20.450.
Survival of remedy after dissolution.

The dissolution of a corporation either by (1) the issuance of a certificate of dissolution by the commissioner, or (2) a decree of the court when the court has not liquidated the assets and business of the corporation as provided in this chapter, or (3) by expiration of its period of duration, does not take away or impair a remedy available to or against the corporation, its directors, officers, or members, for a right or claim existing, or a liability incurred, before dissolution if an action or other proceeding is commenced within two years after the date of dissolution.
The action or proceeding by or against the corporation may be prosecuted or defended by the corporation in its corporate name.
The members, directors, and officers may take appropriate action to protect the remedy, right, or claim.
If the corporation was dissolved by the expiration of its period of duration, it may amend its articles of incorporation at any time during the two year period in order to extend its period of duration.

History.

(§ 1 ch 99 SLA 1968)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989 the term “members” was substituted for “shareholders” in this section to correct a manifest error in ch. 99, SLA 1968.

Sec. 10.20.452.
Continued existence for certain purposes.

If a dissolved corporation is the owner of real or personal property, or claims an interest in or lien upon real or personal property, the corporation through its board of directors continues to exist for five years after the date of dissolution for the purpose of conveying, transferring, or releasing the real or personal property or interest in or lien upon the property. In addition, a dissolved corporation through its board of directors continues to exist for the purpose of being made a party in an action or proceeding arising before dissolution and involving the title to real or personal property or an interest in it.
The action or proceeding may be instituted and maintained in the same manner as before the dissolution of the corporation. This section does not affect or suspend a statute of limitations applicable to a claim.
For the purpose of service of process, notice, or demand within the prescribed time following dissolution, the commissioner is an agent of the dissolved corporation upon whom service may be made in the manner prescribed in AS

10.06.175(b)

.

History.

(§ 56 ch 123 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as subsections (b) and (c) of AS

10.20.450

. Renumbered in 1980.